Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2312
Hearings, appeals; law governing.

Hearings and appeals in contested cases under the provisions of Chapter 44 as the same now provide or may hereafter from time to time be amended shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1971, LB 891, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 63.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.